Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 6. Behavioral Health Authorities.

§ 37.2-600.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Behavioral health”
means the full range of mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services and treatment modalities.

“Behavioral health authority board of directors”
means the public body organized in accordance with provisions of this chapter that is appointed by and accountable to the governing body of the city or county that established it.

“Behavioral health project”
means any facility suitable for providing adequate care for concentrated centers of population and includes structures, buildings, improvements, additions, extensions, replacements, appurtenances, lands, rights in land, franchises, machinery, equipment, furnishings, landscaping, approaches, roadways, and other necessary or desirable facilities.

“Member”
means a person appointed by the governing body of a city or county to the behavioral health authority board of directors.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1677; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-243; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” in the paragraph defining “Behavioral health.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Agency of local government for tax purposes. —

Behavioral health authorities are agencies of local government, and therefore, exempt from state electric utility and natural gas consumption taxes under §§

58.1-2900

and

58.1-2904

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Judith Williams Jagdmann, Commissioner, State Corporation Commission, 17-027, 2018 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (6/15/18).

§ 37.2-601.
Behavioral health authorities; purpose.

The Department, for the purposes of establishing, maintaining, and promoting the development of behavioral health services in the Commonwealth, may provide funds to assist certain cities or counties in the provision of these services.

The governing body of the Cities of Virginia Beach or Richmond or the County of Chesterfield may establish a behavioral health authority and shall declare its intention to do so by resolution.

The behavioral health services provided by behavioral health authorities within the cities or counties they serve shall include:

Emergency services;

Same-day mental health screening services;

Outpatient primary care screening and monitoring services for physical health indicators and health risks and follow-up services for individuals identified as being in need of assistance with overcoming barriers to accessing primary health services, including developing linkages to primary health care providers; and

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them, case management services.

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them, the behavioral health services may include a comprehensive system of inpatient, outpatient, day support, residential, prevention, early intervention, and other appropriate mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services necessary to provide individualized services and supports to persons with mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. Behavioral health authorities may establish crisis stabilization units that provide residential crisis stabilization services.

In order to provide comprehensive mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services within a continuum of care, the behavioral health authority shall function as the single point of entry into publicly funded mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services.

History.

1995, c. 693, §§ 15.1-1676, 15.1-1678; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, §§ 37.1-242, 37.1-244; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2010, c. 28; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, cc. 458, 607, 683.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 607 and 683, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

Acts 2017, cc. 607 and 683, cl. 3 provides: “That, effective July 1, 2021, the core of services provided by community services boards and behavioral health authorities within cities and counties that they serve shall include, in addition to those set forth in subdivisions B 1, 2, and 3 of §

37.2-500

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and subdivisions C 1, 2, and 3 of §

37.2-601

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, respectively, (i) crisis services for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders, (ii) outpatient mental health and substance abuse services, (iii) psychiatric rehabilitation services, (iv) peer support and family support services, (v) mental health services for members of the armed forces located 50 miles or more from a military treatment facility and veterans located 40 miles or more from a Veterans Health Administration medical facility, (vi) care coordination services, and (vii) case management services.”

Acts 2017, cc. 607 and 683, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall report by December 1 of each year to the General Assembly regarding progress in the implementation of the provisions of this act.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 28, effective March 4, 2010,
added the last sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental, and substance abuse services necessary to provide individualized services and supports to persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, or substance abuse” for “mental retardation, and substance abuse services necessary to provide individualized services and supports to persons with mental illnesses, mental retardation, or substance abuse” in the second sentence of the third paragraph and “developmental” for “mental retardation” twice in the last paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458 in subsection D, added “Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them” at the beginning and substituted “developmental disabilities” for “intellectual disability.”

The 2017 amendment by cc. 607 and 683, effective July 1, 2019, are identical and designated the existing paragraphs as subsections A through E, and rewrote subsection C, which read “Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them, the services and, subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them, case management services.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Agency of local government for tax purposes. —

Behavioral health authorities are agencies of local government, and therefore, exempt from state electric utility and natural gas consumption taxes under §§

58.1-2900

and

58.1-2904

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Judith Williams Jagdmann, Commissioner, State Corporation Commission, 17-027, 2018 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (6/15/18).

§ 37.2-602.
Board of directors; appointment; membership.

A city or county, before it shall come within the provisions of this chapter, shall establish a behavioral health authority with a board of directors with no less than six and no more than 18 members. When any city or county establishes a behavioral health authority, the board of directors shall be appointed by the governing body of the city or county establishing the authority. Prior to making appointments, the governing body shall disclose the names of persons being considered for appointment.

Appointments to the board of directors shall be broadly representative of the community. One-third of the appointments to the board shall be individuals who are receiving or who have received services or family members of individuals who are receiving or who have received services, at least one of whom shall be an individual receiving services. One or more appointments may be nongovernmental services providers. Sheriffs or their designees also shall be appointed, when practical.

No board of directors shall include more than two local government officials, elected or appointed, as members.

The board of directors appointed pursuant to this section shall be responsible to the governing body of the city or county that established the authority.

The county or city that establishes a behavioral health authority shall receive an independent annual audit of the total revenues and expenditures from the authority, a copy of which shall be provided to the Department.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1679; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-245; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals who are receiving or who have received services or family members of individuals who are receiving or who have received services, at least one of whom shall be an individual” for “identified consumers or former consumers or family members of consumers or former consumers, at least one of whom shall be a consumer” in the second sentence of the second paragraph.

§ 37.2-603.
Board of directors; terms; vacancies; removal.

The term of office of each member of the behavioral health authority board of directors shall be for three years from January 1 of the year of appointment or, at the option of the governing body of the city or county, from July 1 of the year of appointment, except that of the members first appointed, several shall be appointed for terms of one year each, several for terms of two years each, and the remaining members for terms of three years each. The appointment of members for one-year, two-year, and three-year terms shall be as nearly equal as possible with regard to the total number of members. If the governing body has appointed members for terms commencing January 1 or July 1 but desires to change the date on which the terms of office commence, the governing body may, as the terms of the members then in office expire, appoint successors for terms of two and one-half or three and one-half years, so that the terms expire on June 30 or December 31. Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as original appointments. No person shall be eligible to serve more than three full consecutive three-year terms; however, persons appointed to fill vacancies may serve three additional full consecutive three-year terms. However, after a three-year period has elapsed since the end of the member’s last three-year term, the governing body may reappoint that member. Any member of the board of directors may be removed by the appointing authority for cause, after being given a written statement of the causes and an opportunity to be heard thereon.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1680; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-246; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2009, c. 400.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 400 inserted the next-to-last sentence.

§ 37.2-604.
Board of directors; officers; meetings.

The members of the behavioral health authority board of directors shall annually elect one of their members as chairman and another as vice-chairman and also shall elect a secretary and a treasurer, who may or may not be members, for terms to be determined by the members. The same person may serve as secretary and treasurer. The members shall make regulations and bylaws for their own governance and procedure as they shall determine; they shall meet at least 10 times per year and may hold such special meetings as they deem necessary. The regulations and bylaws shall be submitted to the governing body of the city or county that established the authority for review and comment.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1681; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-247; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-605.
Behavioral health authorities; powers and duties.

Every authority shall be deemed to be a public instrumentality, exercising public and essential governmental functions to provide for the public mental health, welfare, convenience, and prosperity of the residents and such other persons who might be served by the authority and to provide behavioral health services to those residents and persons. An authority shall have the following powers and duties:

Review and evaluate public and private community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services and facilities that receive funds from the authority and advise the governing body of the city or county that established it as to its findings.

Pursuant to §

37.2-608

, submit to the governing body of the city or county that established the authority an annual performance contract for community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services for its approval prior to submission of the contract to the Department.

Within amounts appropriated for this purpose, provide services authorized under the performance contract.

In accordance with its approved performance contract, enter into contracts with other providers for the delivery of services or operation of facilities.

Make and enter into all other contracts or agreements as the authority may determine that are necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and to the execution of powers granted by this chapter, including contracts with any federal agency, any subdivision or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, behavioral health providers, insurers, and managed care or health care networks on such terms and conditions as the authority may approve.

Make policies or regulations concerning the delivery of services and operation of facilities under its direction or supervision, subject to applicable policies and regulations adopted by the Board.

Appoint a chief executive officer of the behavioral health authority, who meets the minimum qualifications established by the Department, and prescribe his duties. The compensation of the chief executive officer shall be fixed by the authority within the amounts made available by appropriation for this purpose. The chief executive officer shall serve at the pleasure of the authority’s board of directors and be employed under an annually renewable contract that contains performance objectives and evaluation criteria. The Department shall approve the selection of the chief executive officer for adherence to minimum qualifications established by the Department and the salary range of the chief executive officer.

Authorize the chief executive officer to maintain a complement of professional staff to operate the behavioral health authority’s service delivery system.

Prescribe a reasonable schedule of fees for services provided by personnel or facilities under the jurisdiction or supervision of the authority and establish procedures for the collection of those fees. All fees collected shall be included in the performance contract submitted to the local governing body pursuant to subdivision 2 and §

37.2-608

and shall be used only for community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services purposes. Every authority shall institute a reimbursement system to maximize the collection of fees from individuals receiving services under the jurisdiction or supervision of the authority, consistent with the provisions of §

37.2-612

, and from responsible third party payors. Authorities shall not attempt to bill or collect fees for time spent participating in commitment hearings for involuntary admissions pursuant to Article 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8.

Accept or refuse gifts, donations, bequests, or grants of money or property or other assistance from the federal government, the Commonwealth, any municipality thereof, or any other sources, public or private; utilize them to carry out any of its purposes; and enter into any agreement or contract regarding or relating to the acceptance, use, or repayment of any such grant or assistance.

Seek and accept funds through federal grants. In accepting federal grants, the authority shall not bind the governing body of the city or county that established it to any expenditures or conditions of acceptance without the prior approval of that governing body.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, disburse funds appropriated to it in accordance with applicable regulations.

Apply for and accept loans in accordance with regulations established by the board of directors.

Develop joint written agreements, consistent with policies adopted by the Board, with local school divisions; health departments; local boards of social services; housing agencies, where they exist; courts; sheriffs; area agencies on aging; and regional offices of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. The agreements shall specify the services to be provided to individuals. All participating agencies shall develop and implement the agreements and shall review the agreements annually.

Take all necessary and appropriate actions to maximize the involvement and participation of individuals receiving services and family members of individuals receiving services in policy formulation and service planning, delivery, and evaluation.

Institute, singly or in combination with community services boards or other behavioral health authorities, a dispute resolution mechanism that is approved by the Department and enables individuals receiving services and family members of individuals receiving services to resolve concerns, issues, or disagreements about services without adversely affecting their access to or receipt of appropriate types and amounts of current or future services from the authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

37.2-400

and regulations adopted thereunder, release data and information about each individual receiving services to the Department, so long as the Department implements procedures to protect the confidentiality of that data and information. Every authority shall submit data on children and youth in the same manner as community services boards, as set forth in §

37.2-507

.

Fulfill all other duties and be subject to applicable provisions specified in the Code of Virginia pertaining to community services boards.

Make loans and provide other assistance to corporations, partnerships, associations, joint ventures, or other entities in carrying out any activities authorized by this chapter.

Transact its business, locate its offices and control, directly or through stock or nonstock corporations or other entities, facilities that will assist the authority in carrying out the purposes and intent of this chapter, including without limitations the power to own or operate, directly or indirectly, behavioral health facilities in its service area.

Acquire property, real or personal, by purchase, gift, or devise on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper and such rights, easements, or estates therein as may be necessary for its purposes and sell, lease, and dispose of the same or any portion thereof or interest therein, whenever it shall become expedient to do so.

Participate in joint ventures with persons, corporations, partnerships, associations, or other entities for providing behavioral health care or related services or other activities that the authority may undertake to the extent that such undertakings assist the authority in carrying out the purposes and intent of this chapter.

Conduct or engage in any lawful business, activity, effort, or project that is necessary or convenient for the purposes of the authority or for the exercise of any of its powers.

As a public instrumentality, establish and operate its administrative management infrastructure in whole or in part independent of the local governing body; however, nothing in the chapter precludes behavioral health authorities from acquiring support services through existing governmental entities.

Carry out capital improvements and bonding through existing economic or industrial development authorities.

Establish retirement, group life insurance, and group accident and sickness insurance plans or systems for its employees in the same manner as cities, counties, and towns are permitted to do under §

51.1-801

.

Provide an annual report to the Department of the authority’s activities.

Ensure a continuation of all services for individuals during any transition period.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1682; 1996, c. 861; 1997, cc. 587, 743, § 37.1-248; 1998, c. 680; 2002, cc. 585, 619, § 37.1-197.3; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 803, 835; 2022, c. 264.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” in subdivisions 1, 2 and 9; substituted “individuals” for “persons” in the third sentence of subdivision 9; and substituted “individuals” for “consumers” in the second sentence of subdivision 14; substituted “individuals receiving services and family members of individuals receiving services” for “consumers and family members of consumers” in subdivision 16; substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” twice in subdivision 17; substituted “each individual receiving services” for “individual consumers” in the first sentence of subdivision 18; substituted “persons” for “individuals” in subdivision 23; and substituted “services for individuals” for “consumer services” in subdivision 29.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and deleted “of this section” following “subdivision 2” in the second sentence of subdivision 9; and substituted “regional offices of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “regional Department of Rehabilitative Services offices” in the first sentence of subdivision 14.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 264, deleted former subdivision 15, which read: “Develop and submit to the Department the necessary information for the preparation of the Comprehensive State Plan for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services pursuant to §

37.2-315

.” and redesignated accordingly.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Agency of local government for tax purposes. —

Behavioral health authorities are agencies of local government, and therefore, exempt from state electric utility and natural gas consumption taxes under §§

58.1-2900

and

58.1-2904

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Judith Williams Jagdmann, Commissioner, State Corporation Commission, 17-027, 2018 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (6/15/18).

§ 37.2-606.
Coordination of services for preadmission screening and discharge planning.

A behavioral health authority shall coordinate services for preadmission screening and discharge planning and provide preadmission screening services and discharge planning in the same manner as community services boards, as set forth in §

37.2-505

.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1682; 1996, c. 861; 1997, cc. 587, 743, § 37.1-248; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-607.
Background check required.

A behavioral health authority shall fulfill the duties of and be subject to the employee background check requirements that are applicable to community services boards, as set forth in §

37.2-506

.

History.

1997, c. 743, § 37.1-197.2; 1998, cc. 130, 680, 882; 1999, c. 685; 2001, c. 784; 2002, c. 712; 2003, c. 468; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-608.
Performance contract for mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services.

The Department shall develop and initiate negotiation of the performance contracts through which it provides funds to behavioral health authorities to accomplish the purposes set forth in this chapter. The Department may, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, disburse state and federal funds appropriated to it for mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services directly to the behavioral health authority. Six months prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, the Department shall make available to the public the standard performance contract form that it intends to use as the performance contract for that fiscal year and solicit public comments for a period of 60 days.

Any behavioral health authority may apply for the assistance provided in this chapter by submitting annually to the Department its proposed performance contract for the next fiscal year together with the approval of its board of directors and the approval by formal vote of the governing body of the city or county that established it. The behavioral health authority shall make its proposed performance contract available for public review and solicit public comments for a period of 30 days prior to submitting its proposed contract for the approval of its board of directors. To avoid disruptions in service continuity and allow sufficient time to complete public review and comment about the contract and negotiation and approval of the contract, the Department may provide up to six semi-monthly payments of state-controlled funds to the authority. If the governing body of the city or county does not approve the proposed performance contract by September 30 of each year, the performance contract shall be deemed approved.

The performance contract shall (i) delineate the responsibilities of the Department and the behavioral health authority; (ii) specify conditions that must be met for the receipt of state-controlled funds; (iii) identify the groups of individuals to be served with state-controlled funds; (iv) contain specific outcome measures for individuals receiving services, provider performance measures, satisfaction measures for individuals receiving services, and participation and involvement measures for individuals receiving services and their family members; (v) contain mechanisms that have been identified or developed jointly by the Department and the behavioral health authority and that will be employed collaboratively by the behavioral health authority and the state hospital to manage the utilization of state hospital beds; (vi) establish an enforcement mechanism, should the behavioral health authority fail to be in substantial compliance with its performance contract, including notice and appeal processes and provisions for remediation, withholding or reducing funds, methods of repayment of funds, and the Department’s exercise of the provisions of subsection E; and (vii) include reporting requirements and information about revenues, costs, services, and individuals receiving services displayed in a consistent, comparable format determined by the Department.The Department may provide for performance monitoring to determine whether behavioral health authorities are in substantial compliance with their performance contracts.

No behavioral health authority shall be eligible to receive state-controlled funds for mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services after September 30 of each year unless (i) its performance contract has been approved by the governing body of the city or county that established it and by the Department; (ii) it provides service, cost, and revenue data and information, and aggregate and individual data and information about individuals receiving services, notwithstanding §

37.2-400

or any regulations adopted thereunder, to the Department in the format prescribed by the Department; and (iii), it uses standardized cost accounting and financial management practices approved by the Department.

If, after unsuccessful use of a remediation process described in the performance contract, a behavioral health authority remains in substantial noncompliance with its performance contract with the Department, the Department may, after affording the authority an adequate opportunity to use the appeal process described in the performance contract, terminate all or a portion of the contract. Using the state-controlled resources associated with that contract, the Department, after consulting with the governing body of the city or county that established the behavioral health authority, may negotiate a performance contract with a community services board, another behavioral health authority, or a private nonprofit or for-profit organization or organizations to obtain services that were the subject of the terminated performance contract.

History.

1998, c. 680, § 37.1-248.1; 2005, cc. 75, 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 75 amended former § 37.1-248.1, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 75 has been given effect in this section as set out above by adding the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” in the second sentence of subsection A; in subsection C, substituted “individuals” for “consumers” in clause (iii); rewrote clause (iv), which read “contains specific consumer provider performance, consumer satisfaction, and consumer and family member participation and involvement measures”; substituted “information about revenues, costs, services, and individuals receiving services” for “revenue, cost, service, and consumer information” in clause (vii); and in subsection D, substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” in the introductory language, and substituted “and revenue data and information, and aggregate and individual data and information about individuals receiving services” in (ii).

§ 37.2-609.
Exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter shall be in all respects for the benefit of persons in the authority’s service area and for the promotion of their safety, health, welfare, convenience, and prosperity. As the operation and maintenance of any behavioral health project that the authority is authorized to undertake will constitute the performance of an essential governmental function, the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any behavioral health project acquired or constructed by it or on the revenues generated by its operation.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1683; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-249; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “persons” for “individuals” in the first sentence.

§ 37.2-610.
Transfer of facilities and assets.

The governing body of the city or county that established the authority is authorized to transfer to the authority the operation and maintenance of suitable facilities that are now or may be hereafter owned by the city or county on the terms and conditions that it may prescribe; but this section shall not be construed as authorizing the authority to maintain and operate such facilities until the operation of them has been transferred by the governing body of the city or county that established it.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1684; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-250; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-611.
Local appropriations; allocation of funds by Department; reduction of funds.

The city or county that established the authority is authorized to make appropriations and to provide funds for the operation of the authority and to further its purposes. Such appropriations for the authority shall be subject to the requirements that are applicable to community services boards, as set forth in §

37.2-509

. The Department shall allocate available state-controlled funds to behavioral health authorities for disbursement in accordance with the provisions that are applicable to community services boards, as set forth in §

37.2-509

, and shall notify the governing body of the city or county that established the authority before implementing any reduction of state-controlled funds.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1685; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-251; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-612.
Liability for expenses of services.

Individuals receiving services shall be liable for the expenses of services provided by a behavioral health authority in the same manner that they are liable to community services boards, as set forth in §

37.2-511

.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1682; 1996, c. 861; 1997, cc. 587, 743, § 37.1-248; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “Individuals receiving services” for “Consumers” at the beginning of the section.

§ 37.2-613.
Proceedings for dissolution.

When the board of directors of a behavioral health authority determines that the need for the authority no longer exists, then, upon a petition by the board to the circuit court of the appropriate city or county, after giving 90 days’ notice to the city or county and upon the production of satisfactory evidence in support of the petition and a detailed dissolution plan, the court may enter an order declaring that the need for the authority in that city or county no longer exists and approving a plan for the winding up of the authority’s business, the payment or assumption of its obligations, and the transfer of its assets. In order for it to be approved by the court, the court must find that this plan describes specifically how the city or county that established the authority will fulfill the same duties and responsibilities required for community services boards under Chapter 5 (§

37.2-500

et seq.) and how the city or county will ensure continuity of care for individuals who are receiving services from the authority.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1686; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-252; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “consumers” in the last sentence.

§ 37.2-614.
When powers and duties cease to exist.

If the court shall enter an order, as provided in §

37.2-613

, that the need for a behavioral health authority no longer exists, then, except for the winding up of its affairs in accordance with the plan approved by the court, the authority’s authorities, powers, and duties to transact business or to function shall cease to exist as of that date set forth in the order of the court.

History.

1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1687; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-253; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716.